Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 1

County Purchasing Law of 1957

5-14-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “County Purchasing Law of 1957.”

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-1401.

Cross-References. Applicability to county election commission, administrator of elections, or any county election official, § 2-12-210.

Centralized purchasing procedure to be utilized, § 8-22-107.

County financial management system, purchasing provisions, §§ 5-21-118 — 5-21-120.

Public contracts, title 12, ch. 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 27.

5-14-102. Local approval.

This part shall be local in effect and shall become effective in a particular county upon the contingency of a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body or other governing body of the county approving this law, or upon the contingency of the majority of the voters casting votes in any election held for this purpose approving this law.

The procedure for elections held for the purpose of approving this law shall be that the county election commission shall call and conduct an election within thirty (30) days after receiving a petition signed by ten percent (10%) of the qualified voters of the county, stating that they favor this law and requesting that an election be held in the county on the subject.

The number of qualified voters in the county is deemed to be the total number of votes cast for all candidates for governor in the last general election, or upon a resolution of the county legislative body, or other governing body, duly certified to the election commission, requesting such an election.

In such an election, the propositions to be voted upon shall be stated on the ballot on separate lines in the following manner: “For the County Purchasing Law of 1957” and “Against the County Purchasing Law of 1957.”

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1402.

5-14-103. Purchasing agent — Appointment — Compensation — Staff.

The county mayor of any county that has adopted this part shall appoint, with the approval of the county legislative body or other governing body, a purchasing agent who shall be a county employee.

A purchasing agent shall be qualified by training and experience to perform the purchasing agent's duties in a proficient manner and in accordance with generally recognized principles of governmental purchasing and in accordance with this part.

Before assuming the purchasing agent's duties, a purchasing agent shall execute a corporate surety bond, the amount of which shall be established by the county mayor at not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

The bond shall be prepared in accordance with title 8, chapter 19, approved by the county legislative body, recorded in the office of the county register of deeds and transmitted to the office of the county clerk for safekeeping.

The premium for such bond shall be paid from the county general fund.

The compensation of the purchasing agent, which shall not be in excess of compensation allowed county officials in accordance with §§ 8-24-101 and 8-24-102, shall be set annually by the county legislative body or other governing body; and the amount of such compensation, the compensation of such clerks and assistants as may be needed, and the other necessary expenses of this office shall be provided for by annual appropriation made by the county legislative body or other governing body from the county general fund.

The purchasing agent has the power, in accordance with such regulations as may be established by the county mayor, to appoint and remove the purchasing agent's assistants, to prescribe their duties, and to fix their salaries within the limits of the annual appropriation made therefor.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1403; Acts 1998, ch. 677, § 4; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2013, ch. 315, §§ 13, 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2013, ch. 315, § 31 provided that the act, which amended subsection (c), shall apply to the renewal or obtaining an official bond for any bonding after April 29, 2013.

Cross-References. County financial management system, finance director as purchasing agent, § 5-21-118.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-14-104. Purchasing agent — Office.

Necessary office space and equipment for the use of the purchasing agent shall be provided and maintained at the county seat of such county.

Such office shall be open for business during the usual hours observed by other officials of the county government.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 14; T.C.A., § 5-1404.

5-14-105. Purchasing agent — Powers and duties.

The county purchasing agent has exclusive power and it is the purchasing agent's duty to:

Contract for and purchase all supplies, materials, equipment and contractual services required by each and every official, agency, office, department or employee of the county government, or that is supported by, or under control of, the county government and that expends or encumbers any of the county's funds. No other official, employee or agent of the county or of any of its departments or agencies shall be authorized to contract for or purchase any such materials, supplies, equipment or contractual services;

Arrange for the rental of machinery, buildings or equipment when the rents are to be paid out of funds belonging to the county or any department, institution or agency thereof; and no other official, employee or agent of the county shall have the right or power to make any contract for such rental;

Transfer materials, supplies and equipment to or between county departments and agencies as may be needed for the proper and efficient administration of the county government; and

Have charge of any central storeroom or central mailing room or similar services that may hereafter be established for the efficient and economical handling of the county's business.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 4; T.C.A., § 5-1405.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of juvenile court to assess fees for services provided to the juvenile, OAG 99-147, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 161 (7/30/99).

5-14-106. County purchasing commission.

A county purchasing commission is hereby created.

The commission shall consist of five (5) members, one (1) of whom shall be the county mayor; the remaining four (4) shall be appointed by the county mayor with the approval of the county governing body.

The members of the commission need not be members of the county governing body.

Such commission shall elect its own chair and shall meet from time to time as it may deem necessary for the discharge of its duties.

It is the duty of the commission to assist the purchasing agent in the determination of overall purchasing policies and in the establishment and promulgation, in accordance with this part, of rules, regulations and procedures to be followed in the making of purchases and contracts for purchase for the county. The actual administration of such activity shall be the sole responsibility of the purchasing agent.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1406; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. § 45-2-405 authorizes any officer, director, or employee of any bank to serve in any local office, including on the county commission, the county budget committee, or the county purchasing commission, so long as he or she discloses the position to the bank and the local government, OAG 07-141, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 141 (10/10/07).

A shareholder of a bank that conducts business with the county is prohibited from serving as a county commissioner, or as a member of the county budget committee or the county purchasing commission, OAG 07-141, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 141 (10/10/07).

5-14-107. Rules and regulations.

The county purchasing agent, with the assistance of the county purchasing commission, shall adopt, promulgate, and may from time to time amend, rules and regulations for the purchase of supplies, materials, equipment and contractual services and specifically for the following purposes:

Authorizing in writing any department, official or agency of the county government to make purchases in the open market for immediate delivery in emergencies, defining such emergencies, describing the manner in which such emergency purchases shall be made and promptly afterward reported to the county purchasing agent;

Prescribing the manner in which supplies, materials and equipment shall be requisitioned, purchased, delivered, stored and distributed, and providing that such shall be conducted in accordance with this part;

Prescribing the dates for submitting requisitions and estimates, the future period they are to cover, the form in which they are to be submitted, the manner of their authentication, and their revision by the county purchasing agent;

Prescribing the manner of inspecting all deliveries of supplies, materials and equipment, and of making or procuring chemical and physical tests of samples submitted with bids and samples of deliveries to determine compliance with specifications;

Requiring periodical and special reports by county departments, agencies, and employees of stocks of surplus, unusable or obsolete supplies and equipment on hand and prescribing the form of such reports;

Providing for the transfer to or between county departments and agencies of supplies and equipment on hand, that are surplus with one (1) department or agency, but that may be needed by another or others, and for the disposal by sale, after receipt of competitive bids, of supplies, materials and equipment that are obsolete or unusable;

Determining whether a deposit or bond is to be submitted with a bid on a purchase contract or sale, and if required, prescribing the amount and form thereof, and providing that such surety shall be forfeited if the successful bidder refuses to enter into contract ten (10) days after the award;

Prescribing the manner in which invoices for supplies, materials, equipment and contractual services delivered to any and all departments, agencies and offices of the county shall be submitted, examined and approved;

Providing for all other such matters as may be necessary to give effect to the foregoing rules and to this part; and

Prescribing the manner in which public auctions for the sale of county-owned property, real or personal, that has become surplus, obsolete or unusable shall be conducted.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 4; T.C.A., § 5-1405; Acts 1984, ch. 647, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 27.

5-14-108. Purchases, sales, etc. — Bidding, auctions.

All purchases of and contracts for purchases of supplies, materials, equipment and contractual services, and all contracts for the lease or rental of equipment, and all sales of county-owned property that has become surplus, obsolete or unusable, shall be based wherever possible on competitive bids.

Contracts for legal services, auditing services by certified public accountants, and similar services by professional persons or groups of high ethical standards shall not be based upon competitive bids but shall be awarded on the basis of recognized competence and integrity.

Bids need not be required for services for which the rate or price is fixed by a public authority authorized by law to fix such rates or prices.

The prohibition in this subsection (a) against competitive bidding shall not prohibit the county from interviewing eligible persons or groups to determine the capabilities of such persons or groups.

The county may purchase materials, supplies, commodities and equipment from any federal, state or local governmental unit or agency, without conforming to the competitive bidding requirements of this part.

If the amount of the expenditure or sale is estimated to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), sealed bids shall be solicited, unless the county legislative body by resolution establishes a higher amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

The county legislative body by resolution may exempt perishable commodities from the requirements of sealed or competitive bidding when such items are purchased in the open market.

The county purchasing agent shall solicit sealed bids by public notice inserted at least once in a newspaper of county-wide circulation, five (5) days prior to the final date for submitting bids or by posting notices on a public bulletin board in the county courthouse.

The county purchasing agent shall also, when deemed necessary or desirable, solicit sealed bids by sending requests by mail to prospective suppliers.

All such notices shall include a general description of the commodities or contractual services to be purchased or property to be sold, and shall state where bid blanks and specifications may be obtained and the time and place of opening bids.

All purchases or sales in amounts that do not require bid solicitation pursuant to subsection (c) may be made by the county purchasing agent in the open market without newspaper notice, but shall whenever possible be based upon at least three (3) competitive bids.

Requisitions for items estimated to cost an amount such as to require public newspaper notice shall not be subdivided in order to circumvent the requirement for public newspaper notice as herein provided.

All sales by the purchasing agent shall be made to the highest responsible bidder.

Bids on purchases shall in all cases be based on such standards as may be adopted and promulgated by the county purchasing agent and approved by the county purchasing commission.

All open market purchase orders or contracts made by the county purchasing agent or in extreme emergencies by any county department or agency shall be awarded to the lowest and best bidder, taking into consideration the qualities of the articles to be supplied, their conformity with specifications, their suitability to the requirements of the county government, and the delivery terms. Any or all bids may be rejected for good cause.

All bids taken under the requirements of this part, and all other documents, including purchase orders, pertaining to the award of contracts on such bids, shall be preserved for a period of five (5) years.

If all bids received on a pending contract are for the same unit price or total amount, the county purchasing agent shall have authority to reject all bids and to purchase the required supplies, materials, equipment or contractual services in the open market; provided, that the price paid in the open market does not exceed the bid price.

All sealed bids received shall be opened publicly at the time and place fixed in the advertisement. Each bid, with the name and address of the bidder, shall be entered on a record, and each record with the names of the bidders, the amounts of their bids, and the name of the successful bidder indicated thereon, shall, after the award or contract or order, be open to public inspection.

All contracts shall be approved as to form by the county attorney, and the original copy of each long-term contract shall be filed with the county clerk.

No purchase shall be made or purchase order or contract of purchase issued but in consequence of a written requisition for the supplies, materials, equipment or contractual services required, which requisition shall be signed by the head of the department, office or agency of the county requiring such articles or services. Original copies of all such requisitions shall be kept on file in the office of the county purchasing agent.

No purchase shall be made or purchase order or contract of purchase issued for tangible personal property or services by county officials or employees, acting in their official capacity, from any firm or individual whose business tax or license is delinquent.

The county purchasing agent is authorized to purchase and contract to purchase materials, supplies, equipment and contractual services on a fiscal year basis, but no commitment shall be made that extends beyond the end of the current fiscal year for which appropriations have been made by the county legislative body, except such commitments as are authorized by resolution of the county legislative body.

In the determination of the county's annual needs of certain commodities or services, or both, the county purchasing agent may request the various departments, offices and agencies of the county government to anticipate their needs for the remainder of the fiscal year and to issue their requisitions based upon such estimates.

Perishable commodities, at the election of the local governing body, may be exempted from the requirements of public advertisements and competitive bidding when such items are purchased in the open market.

A record of all such purchases shall be made by the purchasing agent and shall specify the amount paid, the items purchased, and from whom the purchase was made.

A report of such purchases shall be made to the county mayor and the governing body of the county at frequencies specified by the governing body.

Fuel and fuel products may be purchased in the open market without public newspaper notice, but shall whenever possible be based on at least three (3) competitive bids. Fuel and fuel products may be purchased from the department of general services' contract where available.

This subsection (n) shall apply to any county having a population of not less than seventy-seven thousand seven hundred (77,700) nor more than seventy-seven thousand eight hundred (77,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent census, if it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of any county to which it may apply.

All sales of county-owned property, real or personal in nature, that has become surplus, obsolete or unusable shall be made by public auction or by sealed bid under this section, in the discretion of the purchasing agent or responsible official. “Public auction” includes sale by Internet auction.

The county purchasing agent shall give public notice of such auction by inserting at least once in a newspaper of county-wide circulation or by posting on a public bulletin board in the county courthouse at least five (5) days prior to the date of such auction, a notice specifying the auction date, time, place, property to be sold and terms of such auction.

This subsection (o) does not apply to any books, recordings, or other material previously in general circulation at a county public library; provided, however, that the county public library shall conduct a public sale of surplus, obsolete or otherwise unusable books, recordings or other materials previously in general circulation at the county public library and shall give public notice of such sale by inserting at least once in a newspaper of county-wide circulation, by posting such sale on a web site maintained by the county, or by posting on a public bulletin board in the county courthouse and at the county public library at least five (5) days prior to the date of such sale, a notice specifying generally that such a sale shall occur, including the dates, times, places, and terms of such sale.

Notwithstanding any other law, a procedure may be established upon approval by resolution or ordinance, by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote of the county legislative body, to provide the purchasing agent, upon request of the county mayor, the authority to declare county owned personal property with an accumulative estimated value of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less surplus, obsolete, or unusable personal property and to dispose of the personal property, at the purchasing agent's discretion, by selling the personal property on the open market or by gift, trade, or barter to a nonprofit or charitable organization properly incorporated under the laws of this state and in which no part of the net earnings of the organization inures or may lawfully inure to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual and that it provides services benefiting the general welfare of the residents of the county. Items having an accumulative estimated value that exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall not be subdivided in order to circumvent the requirement for public notice or receipt of sealed bids or selling the property through public or Internet auction. The purchasing agent shall keep all records of transactions of the disposal of personal property under this subdivision (o)(4) for a minimum of five (5) years.

In any county having a population of not less than one hundred seven thousand one hundred (107,100) nor more than one hundred seven thousand two hundred (107,200), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county may purchase and enter into contracts for group health insurance for county employees and officials without conforming to the competitive bidding requirements of this part. This subsection (p) shall only be implemented in any county to which this subsection (p) applies upon the adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of such county.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 7; 1963, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 53, § 1; 1977, ch. 119, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 288, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; modified; T.C.A., § 5-1408; Acts 1984, ch. 604, § 1; 1984, ch. 647, §§ 2-5; 1984, ch. 822, § 1; 1984, ch. 895, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 770, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 179, § 1; 2004, ch. 500, § 1; 2006, ch. 509, § 1; 2007, ch. 122, § 1; 2007, ch. 135, § 1; 2007, ch. 415, § 1; 2009, ch. 173, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 974, § 1; 2013, ch. 162, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1977, ch. 288, § 1 amended this section as it applies to any county of 63,500 to 65,000 (Blount County only).

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Advisory committee for use of the Internet, title 12, ch. 3, part 11.

Distributing and posting solicitations and responses electronically, § 12-3-1004.

Standard specifications for lubricating motor oil, § 12-3-807.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 27.

Attorney General Opinions. Authorization of the county commission is required for the sale of property of the county board of hospital directors; unless the county has adopted the County Purchasing Law of 1957, T.C.A. §§ 5-14-101, et seq., or the County Financial Management System of 1981, T.C.A. §§ 5-21-101, et seq., the commission may authorize sale of the property without advertising for bids, OAG 03-131, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 149 (10/03/03).

5-14-109. Purchases — Certification of adequate funding.

Except in emergencies, no order for delivery on a contract or open market order for supplies, materials, equipment or contractual services for any county department or agency shall be awarded unless it shall be first certified by the director of accounts and budgets, or other county official or employee in charge of the central accounting records of the county that the unencumbered balance in the appropriation chargeable with such purchase in excess of all unpaid obligations, is sufficient to defray the entire cost of such order or contract.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 8; T.C.A., § 5-1409.

5-14-110. Emergency purchases.

The county purchasing agent may authorize any department or agency of the county government to purchase in the open market, without filing requisition or estimate, any supplies, materials or equipment for immediate delivery in actual emergencies arising from unforeseen causes, including delays by contractors, delays in transportation, and unanticipated volume of work; but such emergencies shall not include conditions arising from neglect or indifference in anticipating normal needs.

Such direct emergency purchases, however, may only be made by department or agency heads at times when the office of the county purchasing agent is closed.

At all other times, only the county purchasing agent shall make these purchases.

A report of such emergency purchase, when made by a department or agency head, together with a record of the competitive bids secured and upon which it was based, shall be submitted in writing to the county purchasing agent before the close of the next working day following the date of such purchase, by the head of the county department or agency concerned, together with a full and complete account of the circumstances of such emergency.

Such report shall be kept on file and shall be open to public inspection.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 9; T.C.A., § 5-1410.

5-14-111. Written orders and contracts.

Each purchase order or contract issued or executed pursuant to this chapter shall be evidenced by a written order signed by the county purchasing agent, which shall give all significant details respecting such order or contract.

A copy of such order shall be furnished the vendor, one (1) copy shall be furnished to the county accounting department, and at least two (2) copies shall be retained in the office of the county purchasing agent, one (1) of such copies to be filed in numerical order and the other alphabetically.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 11; T.C.A., § 5-1411.

5-14-112. Purchasing standards and specifications.

It is the duty of the county purchasing agent to:

Classify the requirements of the county government for supplies, materials and equipment;

Adopt as standards the smallest number of quantities, sizes and varieties of such supplies, materials and equipment consistent with the successful operation of the county government; and

Prepare, adopt and promulgate written specifications describing such standards.

In the preparation and revision of such standards, the county purchasing agent shall seek the advice, assistance and cooperation of the county departments and agencies concerned, to ascertain their precise requirements.

Each specification adopted for any commodity shall, insofar as possible, satisfy the requirements of the majority of the county departments and agencies that use the same.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 12; T.C.A., § 5-1412.

5-14-113. Liability of county.

The county shall be liable for the payment of all purchases of supplies, materials, equipment and contractual service made in accordance with this chapter, but shall not be liable for the payment of such purchases made contrary to its provisions.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 13; T.C.A., § 5-1413.

5-14-114. Conflicts of interest — Illegal payments.

Neither the county purchasing agent, nor members of the county purchasing commission, nor members of the county legislative body, nor other officials of the county, shall be financially interested, or have any personal beneficial interest, either directly or indirectly, in any contract or purchase order for any supplies, materials, equipment or contractual services used by or furnished to any department or agency of the county government.

Nor shall any such persons accept or receive, directly or indirectly, from any person, firm or corporation to which any contract or purchase order may be awarded, by rebate, gift or otherwise, any money or anything of value whatsoever, or any promise, obligation or contract for future reward or compensation.

A violation of this section is a Class D felony.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 10; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1414; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 18.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class D felony, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 27.

Attorney General Opinions. Acceptance of gifts from contracting companies, OAG 94-73, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (6/16/94).

T.C.A. § 5-14-114(a) does not prohibit county commissioners from being directly or indirectly interested in a spouse's full-time employment contract with the county because such a contract is not a “contract or purchase order … for contractual services” within the meaning of the statute, OAG 00-152, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 154 (10/6/00).

A county commissioner who works part-time as an independent contractor for a department of county government is prohibited from being directly or indirectly interested in county supply and service contracts, OAG 00-152, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 154 (10/6/00).

A shareholder of a bank that conducts business with the county is prohibited from serving as a county commissioner, or as a member of the county budget committee or the county purchasing commission, OAG 07-141, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 141 (10/10/07).

Conflicts of Interest under T.C.A. § 5-14-114. OAG 12-65, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 65 (6/27/12).

5-14-115. Application to schools.

This part shall not apply to county school funds for any purpose, the county board of education and the county director of schools, unless approved by the commissioner of education.

Upon request by a majority vote of the local board of education and with the approval of the commissioner of education, applicability of this part as it applies to county school funds shall cease to be effective.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 14a; T.C.A., § 5-1415; Acts 1982, ch. 809, § 1.

5-14-116. Construction of part.

This part is not exclusive and shall not prevent the adoption of amendments to existing special or local purchasing laws, or the enactment of special or local purchasing acts.

Acts 1957, ch. 312, § 15; T.C.A., § 5-1416.